Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1337.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 10(b.2) and (m) of the act of March 1, 1988 (P.L.82, No.16), known as the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority Act, are amended to read:Section 10. Financial assistance.* * *(b.2) Nonpoint source management program projects.--A project that is consistent with Pennsylvania's Nonpoint Source Management Program Update, as required under section 319(b) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (62 Stat. 1155, 33 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 U.S.C. § 1329(b)), that has a water quality benefit as determined by the department, shall be eligible for funding, but not refinancing as provided under subsection (m).* * *(m) Refinancing [limitation].--[Financial](1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), financial assistance shall [not] be available under this act for refinancing of any project. [except that the Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund may be used to the extent authorized by the Water Quality Act of 1987 (Public Law 100-4, 101 Stat. 7) for projects commenced after March 7, 1985.](2) A project consistent with Pennsylvania's Nonpoint Source Management Program Update, as required under section 319(b) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, shall not be eligible for refinancing.* * *Section 2. The following regulations are abrogated:(1) 25 Pa. Code § 961.8(a)(7), (b)(7) and (c)(5) (relating to ineligible costs).(2) 25 Pa. Code § 963.17(a)(1) (relating to funding limitations).(3) 25 Pa. Code § 965.4(10) and (11) (relating to eligible costs).(4) All regulations inconsistent with the amendment of section 10(m) of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1337PN1738 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526